North Carolina, session 2025, HB53.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 58-36-75 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-36-75. At-fault accidents and certain moving traffic violations under the Safe Driver
Incentive Plan.
(a) The subclassification plan promulgated pursuant to G.S. 58-36-65(b) may provide for
separate surcharges for major, intermediate, and minor accidents. A "major accident" is an
at-fault accident that results in either (i) bodily injury or death or (ii) only property damage of
three thousand eight hundred fifty dollars ($3,850) five thousand nine hundred seventy-five
dollars ($5,975) or more. An "intermediate accident" is an at-fault accident that results in only
property damage of more than two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) three thousand five
hundred seventy dollars ($3,570) but less than three thousand eight hundred fifty dollars
($3,850). five thousand nine hundred seventy-five dollars ($5,975). A "minor accident" is an
at-fault accident that results in only property damage of two thousand three hundred dollars
($2,300) three thousand five hundred seventy dollars ($3,570) or less. The subclassification plan
may also exempt certain minor accidents from the Facility recoupment surcharge. The Bureau
shall assign varying Safe Driver Incentive Plan point values and surcharges for bodily injury in
at-fault accidents that are commensurate with the severity of the injury, provided that the point
value and surcharge assigned for the most severe bodily injury shall not exceed the point value
and surcharge assigned to a major accident involving only property damage.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to accidents
occurring on or after that date.
*H53-v-1*